lexc/num/enhunum1.lexc
LEXICON Genoa1
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Caseoa;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Caseoa;
                       Caseoa1;
 
LEXICON Caseoa
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig

LEXICON Caseoa1
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoezoa§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig

LEXICON Szoroa
+Tmp:^+cTmp^sz§oeanr§r      Suboa;  ! szor, szer, ször
+Ik[lfea]:^+cIk^ik                NumAcc;  ! ik
                            #;
LEXICON Suboa
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Iadj:^+cIadj^i         #;  ! ra, re
+Kas:^+cKas^§oeanr§s     #;  !as,es,ös képző
                            #;


LEXICON AddNummelyoa
[stem]+Num[gcat]:0     Possmelyoa;
+Num:0     Plurmelyoa;
+Num:0     Fammelyoa;

LEXICON Possmelyoa
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez18§nként     #;    ! anként, enként
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez19§nként     #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA17§st§uue2§l  #;    ! astul, estül
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA18§st§uue2§l  #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or               #;    ! kor
+Par[lfea]:^+cPar^§aeoenrmelya§d       Szormelyoa;  ! od,ed,öd
+Tmp:^+cTmp^sz§oeanrmely§r      Submelyoa;  ! szor, szer, ször
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE17§m   Fammelyoa;   ! m
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE18§m   Fammelyoa;   ! m ! a
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE17§d   Fammelyoa;   ! d
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE18§d   Fammelyoa;   ! d  ! a
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE21§   Fammelyoa;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE2§nk   Fammelyoa;    ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE17§t§OEOE25§k   Fammelyoa;   ! etek, atok
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE18§t§OEOE25§k   Fammelyoa;   ! etek, atok ! a
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE21§k   Fammelyoa;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE22§im   Fammelyoa;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE22§id   Fammelyoa;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE22§i   Fammelyoa;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE22§ink   Fammelyoa;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE22§it§OEOE22§k   Fammelyoa;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE22§ik   Fammelyoa;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fammelyoa1;

LEXICON Plurmelyoa
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez17§k    Genmelyoa;
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez18§k    Genmelyoa; ! a
                            Genmelyoa;
        
LEXICON Fammelyoa
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genmelyoa;
                       Genmelyoa;
LEXICON Fammelyoa1
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genmelyoa;
                       Genmelyoa1;

LEXICON Genmelyoa
+Gens:^+cGens^é        Casemelyoa;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Casemelyoa;
                       Casemelyoa;
LEXICON Genmelyoa1
+Gens:^+cGens^é        Casemelyoa;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Casemelyoa;
                       Casemelyoa1;
 
LEXICON Casemelyoa
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe2§l     #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez24§t    #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA2§l      #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe2§z     #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért           #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA2§k       #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe2§l     #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue2§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe2§l     #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA2§    #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA2§        #;  ! ba, be
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA2§n       #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA2§l    #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0             #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA2§        #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez25§n    #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig            #;  ! ig

LEXICON Casemelyoa1
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe2§l     #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez24§t    #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA2§l      #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe2§z     #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért           #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA2§k       #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe2§l     #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue2§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe2§l     #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA2§    #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA2§        #;  ! ba, be
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA2§n       #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA2§l    #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0             #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA2§        #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez25oa§n    #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig            #;  ! ig

LEXICON Szormelyoa
+Tmp:^+cTmp^sz§oeanrmely§r      Submelyoa;  ! szor, szer, ször
+Ik[lfea]:^+cIk^ik                NumAcc_at;  ! ik
                            #;
LEXICON Submelyoa
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA2§         #;  ! ra, re
+Iadj:^+cIadj^i         #;  ! ra, re
+Kas:^+cKas^§oeanrmely§s     #;  !as,es,ös képző
                            #;

LEXICON AddNuma
[stem]+Num[gcat]:0     Possa;
+Num:0     Plura;
+Num:0     Fama;

LEXICON Possa
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez13§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA2§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Par[lfea]:^+cPar^§aeoenra§d       Szora;  ! od,ed,öd
+Tmp:^+cTmp^sz§oeanr§r      Suba;  ! szor, szer, ször
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE11§m   Fama;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE11§d   Fama;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Fama;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fama;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE11§t§OEOE§k   Fama;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Fama;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Fama;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Fama;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Fama;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Fama;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Fama;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fama1;

LEXICON Plura
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez11§k    Gena;
                            Gena;
        
LEXICON Fama
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Gena;
                       Gena;
LEXICON Fama1
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Gena;
                       Gena1;

LEXICON Gena
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Casea;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Casea;
                       Casea;
LEXICON Gena1
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Casea;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Casea;
                       Casea1;
 

LEXICON Num
nyolc AddNuma;
